District of Columbia statutes.
50-1641.08

Applicability.

Rules promulgated pursuant to this subchapter shall apply to existing, substantially rehabilitated, and new residential, retail, office, and service buildings 6 months after February 2, 2008.

History

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-103, § 9, 54 DCR 12213